District of Columbia statutes.
1-307.88

Annual report to the Mayor and Council.

(a)

The Risk Officer shall submit an annual report to the Mayor and the Council.

(b)

The report shall be filed within 60 days of the Agency filing the annual report with the Commissioner under § 1-307.86(b).

(c)

The report shall summarize the activities of the Agency in the preceding calendar year, including the net earned premiums, health center enrollment in the Agency program, the expense of administration, and the paid and incurred losses.

July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 17-196, § 9, 55 DCR 6261